Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-2,271
Food establishment, food processing plant, or salvage operation; permit; posting; change of ownership or location; duties; mobile food unit or pushcart; copy of permit.

(1) The permit required by section 81-2,270 shall be posted in a conspicuous manner at the food establishment, each location where food handling activity included under a permit is occurring, the food processing plant, or the salvage operation. For a food establishment that does not have a permanent location, the permit location shall be a permanent address where the permitholder may be contacted.

(2) The permit is not transferable to any other person or location. Any permit issued lapses automatically upon a change of ownership or location except as provided in subsection (3) of this section. The permitholder shall notify the department in writing at least thirty days prior to any change in ownership, name, or address.

(3) A permitholder shall provide information regarding the current location of any food handling activity included under the permitholder's permit to the regulatory authority upon request.

(4) Every mobile food unit or pushcart operator shall have a copy of the permit to operate available at the mobile food unit or pushcart when in operation.

Laws 1991, LB 358, § 40;

Laws 1997, LB 199, § 25;

Laws 2012, LB771, § 6;

Laws 2017, LB134, § 9;

Laws 2024, LB262, § 39;

Laws 2025, LB245, § 9.